Massachusetts, session 194th, H1808.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 178L of chapter 6 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by adding the following subsection:-
(3)(a) For offender-initiated motions for reclassification, the burden of proof shall be on
the sex offender to show by clear and convincing evidence that his or her risk of re-offense and
degree of dangerousness posed to the public have decreased following his or her final
classification. In making this determination, the board may consider information used in prior
classification decisions.
of 1